Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Chapter 05. Records Affecting Mining Claims.

Sec. 40.05.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to enable the Department of Natural Resources to accumulate and disseminate information on the status of mining ground in the performance of its prescribed duties.

History.

(§ 1 ch 95 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1961)

Collateral references. —

54 Am. Jur. 2d, Mines and Minerals, §§ 43-51, 409-417.

Sec. 40.05.020.
Reports of instruments affecting mining properties.

The recorder of each recording district shall prepare and forward to the Department of Natural Resources, by the 10th day of each month, a copy of each new mining claim, mining leasehold, prospecting site location certificate, or other document indexed by the recorder as a mining document recorded during the preceding month.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1953; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1996)

Sec. 40.05.030.
Duplicate copies required. [Repealed, § 14 ch 119 SLA 1996.]